Hawaii statutes.
§25-4 Penalty for violation and false
evidence. Any person who, having been summoned under section 25-3 to give
testimony or to produce any books, records, files, papers, maps and documents,
wilfully makes default, or who, having appeared, refuses to answer any
questions or wilfully gives false evidence shall be fined not more than $1,000,
or imprisoned not more than twelve months, or both. [L 1969, c 79, §4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next